North Carolina statutes. Chapter 142. State Debt.
Article 9. State Capital Facilities Finance Act.
§ 142-85.
Security; other requirements.

Security. — In order to secure (i) lease or installment payments to be made to the lessor, seller, or other person advancing moneys or providing financing under a financing contract, (ii) payment of the principal of and interest on bonded indebtedness, or (iii) payment obligations of the State to the provider of bond insurance, a credit facility, a liquidity facility, or a derivative agreement, special indebtedness may create any combination of the following:

A lien on or security interest in one or more, all, or any part of the capital facilities to be financed by the special indebtedness.

If the special indebtedness is to finance construction of improvements on real property, a lien on or security interest in all or any part of the land on which the improvements are to be located.

If the special indebtedness is to finance renovations or improvements to existing facilities or the installation of fixtures in existing facilities, a lien on or security interest in one or more, all, or any part of the facilities.

Value of Security; Multiple Liens. — The estimated value of the property subject to the lien or security interest need not bear any particular relationship to the principal amount of the special indebtedness or other obligation it secures. This Article does not limit the right of the State to grant multiple liens or security interests in a capital facility or other property to the extent not otherwise limited by the terms of any special indebtedness.

Governor’s Budget. — Documentation relating to any special indebtedness may include provisions requesting the Governor to submit in the Governor’s budget proposal or any amendments or supplements to the budget proposed appropriations necessary to make the payments required by the special indebtedness.

Source of Repayment. — The payment of amounts payable by the State under special indebtedness or any related documents during any fiscal period shall be limited to funds appropriated for that purpose by the General Assembly in its discretion.

No Deficiency Judgment or Pledge. — No deficiency judgment may be rendered against the State in any action for breach of any obligation under special indebtedness or any related documents. The taxing power of the State is not and may not be pledged directly or indirectly to secure any moneys due under special indebtedness or any related documents. In the event that the General Assembly does not appropriate sums sufficient to make payments required under any special indebtedness or any related documents, the net proceeds received from the sale or other disposition of the property subject to the lien or security interest shall be applied to satisfy these payment obligations in accordance with the deed of trust, security agreement, or other documentation relating to the lien or security interest. These net proceeds are appropriated for the purpose of making these payments. Any net proceeds in excess of the amount required to satisfy the obligations of the State under any special indebtedness or any related documents shall be paid to the State Treasurer for deposit to the General Fund.

Nonsubstitution Clause. — A financing contract, issue of bonded indebtedness, or other related document shall not contain a nonsubstitution clause that restricts the right of the State to (i) continue to provide a service or conduct an activity or (ii) replace or provide a substitute for any capital facility.

Protection of Lender. — Special indebtedness may contain any provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the person advancing moneys or providing financing under a financing contract, the owners of bonded indebtedness, or others to whom the State is obligated under special indebtedness or any related documents as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law. These provisions may include covenants setting forth the duties of the State in respect of any of the following:

The purposes to which the proceeds of special indebtedness may be applied.

The disposition and application of the revenues of the State, including taxes.

Insuring, maintaining, and other duties with respect to the capital facilities financed.

The disposition of any charges and collection of any revenues and administrative charges.

The terms and conditions of the issuance of additional special indebtedness.

The custody, safeguarding, investment, and application of all moneys.

State Property Law Exception. — Chapter 146 of the General Statutes does not apply to any transfer of the State’s interest in property authorized by this Article, whether to a deed of trust trustee or other secured party as security for special indebtedness, or to a purchaser of property in connection with a foreclosure or similar conveyance of property to realize upon the security for special indebtedness following the State’s default on its obligations under the special indebtedness.

History.

2003-284, s. 46.2; 2003-314, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 79.

§ 142-86.
Financing contract indebtedness.

Documentation. — Financing contract indebtedness shall not be incurred until all documentation providing for its incurrence has been approved by the State Treasurer after the State Treasurer has consulted with the Department of Administration.

Interest Component. — A financing contract may provide for payments under the contract to represent principal and interest components of the cost of the capital facility to be financed, as determined by the State Treasurer.

Bidding. — Financing contracts may be entered into pursuant to any applicable public or competitive bidding process or any private or negotiated process, to the extent required by applicable law and, if not so required, as may be determined by the Department of Administration after consulting with the State Treasurer.

Party. — All financing contracts shall be executed on behalf of the State by the State Treasurer or, upon delegation by the State Treasurer after the State Treasurer’s having approved the financing contract, by the Department of Administration.

Credit Facility. — If the State Treasurer determines that it is in the best interest of the State, the State Treasurer may arrange for the delivery of a credit facility to secure payment under any financing contract. The State Treasurer may also provide that payments by the State representing the interest component of the payments to be made under a financing contract may be calculated based upon a fixed or a variable rate of interest.

Terms and Conditions. — All other conditions set forth elsewhere in this Article with respect to financing contract indebtedness shall also be satisfied prior to incurring any financing contract indebtedness. To the extent applicable as conclusively determined by the State Treasurer, the provisions of

G.S. 142-89

, 142-90, and 142-91 apply to financing contract indebtedness.

History.

2003-284, s. 46.2; 2003-314, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 79.

§ 142-87.
Additional requirements for certificates of participation indebtedness.

Documentation. — A financing contract shall not be used in connection with the delivery of certificates of participation by a special corporation until all documentation providing for its use has been approved by the State Treasurer after the State Treasurer has consulted with the Department of Administration. All documentation providing for the delivery and sale of certificates of participation must be approved by the State Treasurer.

Procedure. — The special corporation, if used, shall request the approval of the State Treasurer in writing and shall furnish any information and documentation relating to the delivery and sale of the certificates of participation requested by the State Treasurer. In determining whether to approve the financing in the documentation, the State Treasurer shall consider the factors set forth in G.S. 142-84(d), as well as the effect of the proposed financing upon any scheduled or proposed sale of debt obligations by the State or a unit of local government in the State.

Terms; Interest. — Certificates of participation may be sold by the State Treasurer in the manner, either at public or private sale, and for any price or prices that the State Treasurer determines to be in the best interest of the State and to effect the purposes of this Article, except that the terms of the sale must also be approved by the special corporation. Interest payable with respect to certificates of participation shall accrue at the rate or rates determined by the State Treasurer with the approval of the special corporation.

Trust Agreement. — Certificates of participation may be delivered pursuant to a trust agreement or similar instrument with a corporate trustee approved by the State Treasurer, and the provisions of G.S. 142-89(h) apply to the trust agreement or similar instrument to the extent applicable.

Other Conditions. — All other conditions set forth elsewhere in this Article with respect to certificates of participation indebtedness, including the conditions set forth in

G.S. 142-86

, must be satisfied before any certificates of participation indebtedness is incurred.

History.

2003-284, s. 46.2; 2003-314, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 79.

§ 142-88.
Bonded indebtedness.

The State Treasurer is authorized, by and with the consent of the Council of State as provided in this Article, to issue and sell at one time or from time to time bonds of the State to be designated “State of North Carolina Limited Obligation Bonds, Series _______________
” or notes of the State as provided in this Article, for the purpose of providing funds, with any other available funds, for the uses authorized in this Article.

History.

2003-284, s. 46.2; 2003-314, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 79.

§ 142-89.
Issuance of limited obligation bonds and notes.

(Effective January 1, 2019, and expires December 31, 2028) Terms and Conditions. — Bonds or notes may bear any dates; may be serial or term bonds or notes, or any combination of these; may mature in any amounts and at any times, not exceeding 15 years from their dates for Build NC Bonds and 40 years from their dates for all other bonds and notes; may be payable at any places, either within or without the United States, in any coin or currency of the United States that at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and private debts; may bear interest at any rates, which may vary from time to time; and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the State or otherwise as may be provided by the State, at any prices, including a price greater than the face amount of the bonds or notes, and under any terms and conditions, all as may be determined by the State Treasurer, by and with the consent of the Council of State.

(a)

(Effective January 1, 2029) Terms and Conditions. —

Bonds or notes may bear any dates; may be serial or term bonds or notes, or any combination of these; may mature in any amounts and at any times, not exceeding 40 years from their dates; may be payable at any places, either within or without the United States, in any coin or currency of the United States that at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and private debts; may bear interest at any rates, which may vary from time to time; and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the State or otherwise as may be provided by the State, at any prices, including a price greater than the face amount of the bonds or notes, and under any terms and conditions, all as may be determined by the State Treasurer, by and with the consent of the Council of State.

Signatures; Form and Denomination; Registration. — Bonds or notes may be issued in certificated or uncertificated form. If issued in certificated form, bonds or notes shall be signed on behalf of the State by the Governor or bear the Governor’s facsimile signature, shall be signed by the State Treasurer or bear the State Treasurer’s facsimile signature, and shall bear the great seal of the State or a facsimile of the seal impressed or imprinted on them. If bonds or notes bear the facsimile signatures of the Governor and the State Treasurer, the bonds or notes shall also bear a manual signature which may be that of a bond registrar, trustee, paying agent, or designated assistant of the State Treasurer. If any officer whose signature or facsimile signature appears on bonds or notes issued under this Article ceases to be that officer before the delivery of the bonds or notes, the signature or facsimile signature shall nevertheless have the same validity for all purposes as if the officer had remained in office until delivery of the bonds or notes. Bonds or notes issued under this Article may bear the facsimile signatures of persons who, at the actual time of the execution of the bonds or notes, were the proper officers to sign any bond or note although at the date of the bond or note those persons may not have been officers.The form and denomination of bonds or notes, including the provisions with respect to registration of the bonds or notes and any system for their registration, shall be as prescribed by the State Treasurer in conformity with this Article.

Manner of Sale; Expenses. — Subject to the approval by the Council of State as to the manner in which bonds or notes will be offered for sale, whether at public or private sale, whether within or without the United States, and whether by publishing notices in certain newspapers and financial journals, mailing notices, inviting bids by correspondence, negotiating contracts of purchase, or otherwise, the State Treasurer is authorized to sell bonds or notes at one time or from time to time at any rates of interest, which may vary from time to time, and at any prices, including a price less than the face amount of the bonds or notes, as the State Treasurer may determine. All expenses incurred in the preparation, sale, and issuance of bonds or notes shall be paid by the State Treasurer from the proceeds of bonds or notes or other available moneys.

Application of Proceeds. — The proceeds of any bonds or notes shall be used solely for the purposes for which the bonds or notes were issued and shall be disbursed in the manner and under the restrictions, if any, that the Council of State may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of, or in any trust agreement securing, the bonds or notes.Any additional moneys that may be received by means of a grant or grants from the United States or any agency or department thereof or from any other source to aid in financing the cost of a capital facility may be disbursed, to the extent permitted by the terms of the grant or grants, without regard to any limitations imposed by this Article.

Notes; Repayment. — By and with the consent of the Council of State, the State Treasurer is authorized to borrow money and to execute and issue notes of the State for the same, but only in any of the following circumstances and under the following conditions:

For anticipating the sale of bonds, the issuance of which the Council of State has approved, if the State Treasurer considers it advisable to postpone the issuance of the bonds.

For the payment of interest on or any installment of principal of any bonds then outstanding, if there are not sufficient funds in the State treasury with which to pay the interest or installment of principal as they respectively become due.

For the renewal of any loan evidenced by notes authorized in this Article.

For the purposes authorized in this Article.

For refunding bonds or notes or financing contract indebtedness as authorized in this Article.Funds derived from the sale of limited obligation bonds or notes may be used in the payment of any bond anticipation notes issued under this Article. Funds provided by the General Assembly for the payment of interest on or principal of bonds shall be used in paying the interest on or principal of any notes and any renewals thereof, the proceeds of which have been used in paying interest on or principal of the bonds.

Refunding Bonds and Notes. — By and with the consent of the Council of State, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue and sell refunding bonds and notes for the purpose of refunding special indebtedness and to pay the cost of issuance of the refunding bonds or notes. The refunding bonds and notes may be combined with any other issues of State bonds and notes issued pursuant to this Article. Refunding bonds or notes may be issued at any time prior to the final maturity of the debt or obligation to be refunded. The proceeds from the sale of any refunding bonds or notes shall be applied to the immediate payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded or, if not required for the immediate payment of the obligations being refunded, the proceeds shall be deposited in trust to provide for the payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded and to pay any expenses incurred in connection with the refunding. Money in a trust fund may be invested in (i) direct obligations of the United States government, (ii) obligations the principal of and interest on which are guaranteed by the United States government, (iii) to the extent then permitted by law, obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the United States government, or (iv) certificates of deposit issued by a bank or trust company located in the State if the certificates are secured by a pledge of any of the obligations described in (i), (ii), or (iii) above having an aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, equal at least to the principal amount of the certificates so secured. This section does not limit the duration of any deposit in trust for the retirement of obligations being refunded but that have not matured and are not presently redeemable or, if presently redeemable, have not been called for redemption.

Security. — Payment of the principal of and the interest on bonds and notes shall be secured as provided in

G.S. 142-85

.

Trust Agreement. — In the discretion of the State Treasurer, any bonds and notes issued under this Article may be secured by a trust agreement or similar instrument between the State and a corporate trustee or by a resolution of the Council of State providing for the appointment of a corporate trustee. The corporate trustee may be, in either case, any trust company or bank that has the powers of a trust company within or without the State. The trust agreement or similar instrument or resolution, hereinafter referred to as “the trust”, may provide for security and pledges and assignments that are permitted under this Article and may provide for the granting of a lien or security interest as authorized by

G.S. 142-85

. The trust may contain any provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the owners of any bonds or notes issued under the trust that are reasonable and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the State with respect to the purposes for which bond or note proceeds may be applied, the disposition and application of the revenues or assets of the State, the duties of the State with respect to the capital facilities financed, the disposition of any charges and collection of any revenues and administrative charges, the terms and conditions of the issuance of additional bonds and notes, and the custody, safeguarding, investment, and application of all moneys. All bonds and notes issued under this Article pursuant to the same trust shall be equally and ratably secured as provided in the trust, without priority by reasons of number, dates of bonds or notes, execution, or delivery, in accordance with the provisions of this Article and of the trust. The trust may, however, provide that bonds or notes issued pursuant to the trust shall, to the extent and in the manner prescribed in the trust, be subordinated and junior in standing, with respect to the payment of principal and interest and to the security of the payment, to any other bonds or notes issued pursuant to the trust. It is lawful for any bank or trust company that may act as depositary of the proceeds of bonds or notes, revenues, or any other money under this Article to furnish any indemnifying bonds or to pledge any securities that may be required by the State Treasurer. The trust may set out the rights and remedies of the owners of any bonds or notes and of any trustee and may restrict the individual rights of action by the owners. In addition to the foregoing, the trust may contain any other provisions the State Treasurer considers appropriate for the security of the owners of any bonds or notes. Expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of the trust may be treated as a part of the cost of any capital facility or as an administrative charge and may be paid from the proceeds of the bonds or notes or from any other available funds.

History.

2003-284, s. 46.2; 2003-314, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 79; 2018-16, s. 5.

Subsection (a) Set Out Twice.

The first version of subsection (a) set out above expires December 31, 2028. The second version of subsection (a) set out above is effective January 1, 2029.

Build NC Bond Act of 2018.

Session Laws 2018-16, ss. 1, 2, provides: “(1) Short Title. — This act shall be known as the “Build NC Bond Act of 2018.

“(2) Legislative Intent. — The intent of the Build NC Bond Act of 2018 is to maintain the integrity of the Strategic Transportation Investments Act (STI). Toward this end and consistent with STI:

“(1) The bond proceeds shall not be treated as revenue.

“(2) Debt service is subject to the distribution formula in G.S. 136-189.11.

“(3) Funds distributed under the Build NC Bond Act of 2018 to be used for the Regional Impact Projects tier shall be allocated within two percent (2%) by population of Distribution Regions based on the most recent estimates certified by the Office of State Budget and Management and used for Regional Impact Projects pursuant to the criteria in G.S. 136-189.11(d)(2)a.

“(4) Funds distributed under the Build NC Bond Act of 2018 to be used for the Division Need Projects tier shall be allocated within two percent (2%) of an equal share to each of the Department divisions, as defined in G.S. 136-14.1, and used for Division Need Projects pursuant to the criteria in G.S. 136-189.11(d)(3)a.

“(5) The formula variance in G.S. 136-189.11(e) shall only apply to the debt service.

“(6) Nothing in the Build NC Bond Act of 2018 prevents the issuance of other bonds or special indebtedness for highway or transportation purposes under Article 9 of Chapter 142 of the General Statutes.”

Session Laws 2018-16, s. 6, provides:
“The State Treasurer, in consultation with the Department of Transportation, shall develop and implement a debt management policy to guide the Department’s practices in regards to issuing Build NC Bonds, as defined in

G.S. 142-82(2a)

, as enacted by Section 3 of this act. By July 1, 2019, the State Treasurer shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee detailing the debt management plan developed in accordance with this section.”

Session Laws 2018-16, s. 7, provides, in part, that the amendment of subsection (a) by Session Laws 2018-16, s. 5, expires December 31, 2028.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-16, s. 5, effective January 1, 2019, substituted “15 years from their dates for Build NC Bonds and 40 years from their dates for all other bonds and notes” for “40 years from their dates” in subsection (a). For expiration of amendment, see editor’s note.

§ 142-90.
Variable rate demand bonds and notes and financing contract indebtedness.

In fixing the details of special indebtedness, the State Treasurer may make the special indebtedness subject to any of the following conditions:

It is payable from time to time on demand or tender for purchase by the owner thereof if a credit facility supports the special indebtedness, unless the State Treasurer specifically determines that a credit facility is not required upon a determination by the State Treasurer that the absence of a credit facility will not materially and adversely affect the financial position of the State or the marketing of the bonds or notes or financing contract indebtedness at a reasonable interest cost to the State.

It is additionally supported by a credit facility.

It is subject to redemption or mandatory tender for purchase prior to maturity.

It bears interest at a rate or rates that may be fixed or may vary over any period of time, as may be provided in the proceedings providing for the issuance or incurrence of the special indebtedness, including any variations that may be permitted pursuant to a par formula.

It is the subject of a remarketing agreement under which an attempt is made to remarket special indebtedness to new purchasers before its presentment for payment to the provider of the credit facility or to the State.

If the aggregate principal amount payable by the State under a credit facility is in excess of the aggregate principal amount of special indebtedness secured by the credit facility, whether as a result of the inclusion in the credit facility of a provision for the payment of interest for a limited period of time or the payment of a redemption premium or for any other reason, then the amount of authorized but unissued bonds or notes and financing contract indebtedness during the term of the credit facility shall not be less than the amount of the excess, unless the payment of the excess is otherwise provided for by agreement of the State executed by the State Treasurer.

History.

2003-284, s. 46.2; 2003-314, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 79.

§ 142-91.
Other agreements.

The State Treasurer may authorize, execute, obtain, or otherwise provide for bond insurance, investment contracts, credit and liquidity facilities, credit enhancement facilities, interest rate swap agreements and other derivative products, and any other related instruments and matters the State Treasurer determines are desirable in connection with the issuance of special indebtedness. The State Treasurer is authorized to employ and designate any financial consultants, underwriters, fiduciaries, and bond attorneys to be associated with any incurrence or issuance of special indebtedness under this Article as the State Treasurer considers appropriate.

History.

2003-284, s. 46.2; 2003-314, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 79.

§ 142-92.
Tax exemption.

Special indebtedness shall at all times be free from taxation by the State or any political subdivision or any of their agencies, excepting income taxes on the gain from the transfer of the indebtedness; and franchise taxes. The interest component of any payments made by the State under special indebtedness, including the interest component of any certificates of participation, is not subject to taxation as to income.

History.

2003-284, s. 46.2; 2003-314, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 79; 2015-264, s. 16(h).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 16(h), effective October 1, 2015, deleted “estate, inheritance, and gift taxes” preceding “income taxes on the gain” near the middle of the first sentence.

§ 142-93.
Investment eligibility.

Special indebtedness are securities or obligations in which all of the following may invest, including capital in their control or belonging to them: public officers, agencies, and public bodies of the State and its political subdivisions; insurance companies, trust companies, investment companies, banks, savings banks, savings and loan associations, credit unions, pension or retirement funds, and other financial institutions engaged in business in the State; and executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries. Special indebtedness are securities or obligations that may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any officer or agency of the State or political subdivision of the State for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds, notes, or obligations of the State or any political subdivision of the State is now or may later be authorized by law.

History.

2003-284, s. 46.2; 2003-314, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 79.

§ 142-94.
Procurement of capital facilities.

The provisions of Articles 3, 3B, 3C, 3D, and 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and any other laws or rules of the State that relate to the acquisition and construction of State property apply to the financing of capital facilities through the use of special indebtedness pursuant to this Article. This section does not apply to the construction and lease-purchase, including leases with an option to purchase at the end of the lease term for a nominal sum, of State office buildings pursuant to proposals submitted before the effective date of this Article in response to requests for proposals, to the extent any of those proposals, as they may be supplemented or amended, are approved by the Department of Administration and any of these leases or lease-purchase agreements are approved by the Council of State in accordance with

G.S. 143-341(4)

d2. With the exception of Article 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, this section does not apply to any special indebtedness issued pursuant to this Article for the purchase, construction, or operation of capital facilities by Gateway University Research Park, Inc., a joint Millennial Campus in Greensboro.

History.

2003-284, s. 46.2; 2003-314, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 79; 2008-204, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-204, s. 3, effective August 8, 2008, added the last sentence.

§ 142-95.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-527, s. 39, effective August 31, 2007.

§ 142-96.
Savings from refinancing of special indebtedness to be placed in the Savings Reserve Account.

Whenever special indebtedness issued or incurred pursuant to this Article is refinanced:

The General Assembly shall not reduce the funds appropriated for servicing the refinanced debt during the fiscal biennium in which the refinancing occurs.

The State Controller shall, in conjunction with the State Treasurer, periodically transfer the savings resulting from the refinancing of the debt to the Savings Reserve established pursuant to

G.S. 143C-4-2

during the fiscal biennium in which the refinancing occurs.

The Director of the Budget shall, in the fiscal biennium immediately following the refinancing, adjust the amount of debt service funded in the base budget so that it aligns with actual debt service needs.

Subsection (a) of this section applies only if, and to the extent that, the balance of the Savings Reserve remains below the recommended Savings Reserve balance developed pursuant to G.S. 143C-4-2(f).

This section does not apply to special indebtedness of the State serviced by the Highway Fund or Highway Trust Fund or other transportation-related debt financing arrangements.

If, and to the extent that, the balance of the Savings Reserve is at or above the recommended Savings Reserve balance developed pursuant to G.S. 143C-4-2(f), whenever special indebtedness issued or incurred by the State is refinanced, the following shall apply:

The General Assembly shall not reduce the funds appropriated for serving the refinanced debt during the fiscal biennium in which the refinancing occurs.

The State Controller shall, in conjunction with the State Treasurer, periodically transfer the savings resulting from the refinancing of the debt to the Unfunded Liability Solvency Reserve, established under

G.S. 143C-4-10

, during the fiscal biennium in which the refinancing occurs.

In the fiscal biennium immediately following the refinancing, the Director of the Budget shall adjust the amount of debt service funded in the base budget so that it aligns with the actual debt service needs.

History.

2015-241, s. 6.23(b); 2017-5, s. 4; 2018-30, s. 2(b).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 6.23(c) made this section effective July 1, 2017, and applicable to indebtedness issued, incurred, or refinanced on or after that date.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2015.’ ”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 33.6, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-5, s. 4, 142-96, effective October 1, 2017, substituted “Savings Reserve” for “Savings Reserve Account” in the section heading; designated the existing provisions as subsection (a); deleted “Account” following “Savings Reserve” in subdivision (a)(2); and added subsections (b) and (c).

Session Laws 2018-30, s. 2(b), effective October 1, 2018, added subsection (d).